Washington statutes.
RCW 35.44.080

Assessment roll—Notice of hearing.

The notice of hearing upon the assessment roll shall specify the time and place of hearing and shall notify all persons who may desire to object thereto:

(1) To make their objections in writing and to file them with the city or town clerk at or prior to the date fixed for the hearing;

(2) That at the time and place fixed and at times to which the hearing may be adjourned, the council will sit as a board of equalization for the purpose of considering the roll; and

(3) That at the hearing the council or committee or officer will consider the objections made and will correct, revise, raise, lower, change, or modify the roll or any part thereof or set aside the roll and order the assessment to be made de novo.

Following the hearing the council shall confirm the roll by ordinance.

[ 1979 ex.s. c 100 s 2; 1965 c 7 s 35.44.080. Prior: 1929 c 97 s 3, part; 1911 c 98 s 21, part; RRS s 9373, part.]